Massachusetts, session 194th, H3702.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 82 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is 
hereby amended by inserting after Section 40E, the following new section:- 
Section 40F. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any public way, 
including a public road, sidewalk or curb, that has been excavated by a person, corporation or 
other entity authorized by a permit issued under this chapter or by local government, the person, 
corporation or entity shall, at its own expense, replace and restore the surface of the public way 
to its original condition, or better with the same or like materials upon completion of the work. 
The replacement with the same or like materials shall be done in accordance with the appropriate 
rules or regulations issued by the Department of Public Utilities. The replacement with the same 
or like materials shall include the same, if any, surface markings including but not limited to 
crosswalks, lane lines, bike lanes, and symbols. The person, corporation or other entity shall be 
responsible for any damages to the replaced surface of the way caused by the excavation for a 
one-year period after the work has been completed.  

of 2 14  SECTION 2. The act shall go into effect one year after its passage.